Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 2. Town Meetings and Local Elections in General
§ 2651f.
Municipal treasurer; appointment; removal.

A municipality may vote at an annual meeting to authorize the legislative body to appoint the municipal treasurer.
(a) (1) A municipality may vote at an annual meeting to authorize the legislative body to appoint the municipal treasurer.

A treasurer so appointed may be removed by the legislative body for just cause after notice and hearing.

A vote to authorize the legislative body to appoint the treasurer shall remain in effect until rescinded by the majority vote of the registered voters present and voting at an annual or special meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

The term of office of a treasurer in office on the date a municipality votes to allow the legislative body to appoint a treasurer shall expire 45 calendar days after the vote or on the date upon which the legislative body appoints a treasurer under this section, whichever occurs first, unless a petition for reconsideration or rescission is filed in accordance with section 2661 of this title.

The authority to authorize the legislative body to appoint the treasurer as provided in this section shall extend to all municipalities except those that have a charter that specifically provides for the election or appointment of the office of municipal treasurer.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 27

, § 3, eff. May 10, amended 2017;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 2652.
Road and water commissioners.

The selectboard may and, when requested by at least five percent of the legal voters of a town at least 47 days prior to the annual town meeting, it shall insert in the warning for the annual town meeting an article on the question of whether the town shall elect a road commissioner or commissioners, or water commissioners, as provided in section 2651 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 50

, § 51.

§ 2653.
Acceptance of office.

A person present at the meeting electing him or her to municipal office shall be treated as accepting, unless he or she declines before the meeting is adjourned.
When not present, he or she shall be served as soon as possible with a written notice, signed by the clerk and served by the constable.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2654.
Refusal to serve.

A person may refuse to accept election or appointment to any municipal office.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2655.
Time of meeting.

Annual municipal business meetings shall begin at the time set by the legislative body, unless the municipality has voted otherwise at a preceding meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 101.

§ 2656.
Qualification and registration of voters.

Regardless of the type of voting used, the qualifications to vote in any municipal election shall be as provided in chapter 43 of this title and all municipalities shall revise and post checklists as provided in chapter 43 of this title prior to any municipal meeting at which there will be voting.
The presiding officer shall follow reasonable and necessary procedures to ensure that persons who are not voters of the town do not vote.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 102.

§ 2657.
Moderator.

A municipal meeting shall be called to order by the moderator, or in his or her absence by a selectboard member who shall preside until a moderator pro tempore is chosen.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2658.
Duties.

The moderator shall be the presiding officer of municipal meetings, shall decide questions of order and shall make public declaration of votes taken, except in elections using the Australian ballot system.
When a vote declared by him or her is immediately questioned by one voter, he or she shall divide the meeting, and if requested by seven voters, shall cause the vote to be taken by paper ballot, unless the town has provided some other procedure in such cases.
Robert’s Rules or some other rules of order shall govern all municipal meetings, except in elections using the Australian ballot system.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 103;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2659.
Preservation of order.

The moderator shall preserve order in the conduct of business and in debate.
If a person, after notice, is persistently disorderly and refuses to withdraw from the meeting, the moderator may cause him or her to be removed, calling upon the constable or other person for that purpose.
A person who so refuses to withdraw when ordered so to do shall be fined not more than $200.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2660.
Conduct of election.

When voting is at a floor meeting by paper ballot, the polls shall be kept open a reasonable time and reasonable notice shall be given before they close.

When election is by ballot, a majority of all votes cast for any office shall be required for an election, unless otherwise provided by law; provided that when there is but one nominee for an office, unless objection is made, the legal voters may vote to instruct the town clerk to cast one ballot for such nominee and upon such ballot being cast he or she shall be declared elected.

If no person has obtained a majority by the end of the third vote, the moderator shall announce that the person receiving the least number of votes in the last vote and in each succeeding vote shall no longer be a candidate, and the voting shall continue until a candidate receives a majority.

The article entitled “other business” shall not be used for taking binding municipal action, and the moderator shall so rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 260

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 104;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 49.

§ 2661.
Reconsideration or rescission of vote.

A warned article voted on at an annual or special meeting of a municipality shall not be submitted to the voters for reconsideration or rescission at the same meeting after the assembly has begun consideration of another article. If the voters have begun consideration of another article, the original article may only be submitted to the voters at a subsequent annual or special meeting duly warned for the purpose and called by the legislative body on its own motion or pursuant to a petition requesting such reconsideration or rescission signed and submitted in accordance with subsection (b) of this section. A vote taken at an annual or special meeting shall remain in effect unless rescinded or amended.

If a petition requesting reconsideration or rescission of a question considered or voted on at a previous annual or special meeting is filed with the clerk of the municipality within 30 days following the date of that meeting, the legislative body shall provide for a vote by the municipality in accordance with the petition within 60 days of the submission at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose. The number of signatures required for a petition for reconsideration or rescission shall be not less than five percent of the registered voters unless the voters of the municipality increase that percentage pursuant to the following:

At a meeting duly warned for the purpose, the voters of a municipality may require that a petition for reconsideration be signed by a percentage of registered voters that is not less than five percent nor greater than 20 percent.

A vote to increase the percentage of voters required to sign a petition for reconsideration or rescission to up to 20 percent shall be in substantially the following form: “Shall the (name of municipality) increase the percentage of voters required on a petition for reconsideration or rescission from five to (up to 20) percent?”

Once the voters of a municipality have voted to require a new percentage, that percentage shall remain in effect until the voters of the municipality vote to change the percentage.

A question voted on shall not be presented for reconsideration or rescission at more than one subsequent meeting within a one-year period, except with the approval of the legislative body.

For a vote by Australian ballot:

The form of the ballot shall be as follows: “Article 1: [cite the article to be reconsidered as lastly voted].”

Absentee ballots for the reconsideration or rescission vote shall be sent to any voter who requested an absentee ballot for the initial vote on the article to be reconsidered or rescinded, whether or not a separate request for an absentee ballot for the reconsideration or rescission vote is submitted by the voter.

A majority vote in favor of reconsideration or rescission of a question voted on by paper or Australian ballot shall not be effective unless the number of votes cast in favor of reconsideration or rescission exceeds two-thirds of the number of votes cast for the prevailing side at the original meeting unless the voters of the municipality approve a different percentage pursuant to the following:

At a meeting duly warned for the purpose, the voters of a municipality may require that a vote in favor of reconsideration or rescission shall not be effective unless the number of votes cast in favor of reconsideration or rescission exceeds a certain percentage of the number of votes cast for the prevailing side at the original meeting.

A vote to increase or decrease the percentage shall be in substantially the following form: “Shall the (name of municipality) change the percentage of votes cast in favor of reconsideration or rescission required for a vote to reconsider or rescind a question considered or voted on at a previous annual or special meeting to be effective to (percentage)?”

Once the voters of a municipality have voted to require a new percentage, that percentage shall remain in effect until the voters of the municipality vote to change the percentage.

A municipality shall not reconsider a vote to elect a local officer.

This section shall not apply to nonbinding advisory articles, which shall not be subject to reconsideration or rescission.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 105;

1991, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.);

2007, No. 36

, § 1;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 50;

2017, No. 50

, § 52.

§ 2662.
Validation of municipal meetings.

When any of the requirements as to notice or warning of an annual or special municipal meeting have been omitted or not complied with, the omission or noncompliance, if the meeting and the business transacted at it is otherwise legal and within the scope of the municipal powers, may be corrected and legalized by vote at a regular meeting or special meeting of the municipality called and duly warned for that purpose.
The question to be voted upon shall substantially be, “Shall the action taken at the meeting of this town (or city, village or district) held on (state date) in spite of the fact that (state the error or omission), and any act or action of the municipal officers or agents pursuant thereto be readopted, ratified, and confirmed.” Errors or omissions in the conduct of an original meeting that are not the result of an unlawful notice or warning or noncompliance within the scope of the warning may be cured by a resolution of the legislative body of the municipality by a vote of two-thirds of all its members at a regular meeting or a special meeting called for that purpose, stating that the defect was the result of oversight, inadvertence, or mistake.
When an error or omission of this nature has been thus corrected by resolution, all business within the terms of the action of the qualified voters shall be as valid as if the requirements had been initially complied with, condition, however, that the original action thereby corrected by the legislative body was in compliance with the legal exercise of its corporate powers.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2663.
Certificate of vote.

Whenever an act of the General Assembly by its provisions takes effect only when accepted by vote of a municipality, the clerk of the municipality shall certify within 10 days to the Secretary of State the result of such vote.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2664.
Budget.

At its annual meeting, a town shall vote such sums of money as it deems necessary for the interest of its inhabitants and for the prosecution and defense of the common rights. It shall express in its vote the specific amounts, or the rate on a dollar of the grand list, to be appropriated for laying out and repairing highways and for other necessary town expenses. If a town votes specific amounts in lieu of a rate on a dollar of the grand list, the selectboard shall, after the grand list book has been computed and lodged in the office of the town clerk, set the tax rate necessary to raise the specific amounts voted. The selectboard may apply for grants and may accept and expend grants or gifts above those that are approved in the town budget. The selectboard shall include, in its annual report, a description of all grants or gifts accepted during the year and associated expenditures.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2015, No. 30

, § 25, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2665.
Notification to Secretary of State.

The town clerk shall file with the Secretary of State a list of the names and addresses of the selectboard members elected and shall notify the Secretary of State of any changes in the list as filed.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 106.

§ 2666.
Improper influence.

Neither the warning, the notice, the official voter information cards, nor the ballot itself shall include any opinion or comment by any town body or officer or other person on any matter to be voted on.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 107.

§ 2667.
Access to annual meeting.

The legislative body of the municipality shall take reasonable measures to ensure that voters who are elders or have a disability may conveniently attend annual or special meetings; provided, however, that such measures need not be taken if doing so would impose undue hardship on the town. Measures may include location of meetings on the ground floor of buildings or providing ramps or other devices for access to meetings. In municipal elections using the Australian ballot system of voting, subsection 2502(b) of this title shall apply. For the purposes of this section, the legislative body shall have full jurisdiction on the day of the municipal meeting over the premises at which the town meeting is to be held.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 90

, § 2, eff. April 29, 1983; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 85.